Hawaii statutes.
[§346-59.1] Coverage for
telehealth. [Section effective January 1, 2017.] (a) The State's
medicaid managed care and fee-for-service programs shall not deny coverage for
any service provided through telehealth that would be covered if the service
were provided through in-person consultation between a patient and a health
care provider.

(b) Reimbursement for services provided
through telehealth shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services
provided via face-to-face contact between a health care provider and a
patient. Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be
physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care
provider at the distant site deems it necessary.

(c) There shall be no geographic restrictions
or requirements for telehealth coverage or reimbursement under this section.

(d) There shall be no restrictions on
originating site requirements for telehealth coverage or reimbursement under
this section.

(e) Services provided by telehealth pursuant
to this section shall be consistent with all federal and state privacy,
security, and confidentiality laws.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the provisions of this section shall comply with the applicable
federal requirements related to utilization, coverage, and reimbursement for
telehealth services.

(g) For the purposes of this section:

"Distant site" means the location of
the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the
services are provided.

"Health care provider" means a
provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section
1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title
42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the
State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or
organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal
course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental
health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under
chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed
under chapter 448.

"Originating site" means the location
where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care
provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through
telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office,
hospital, critical access hospital, rural health clinic, federally qualified
health center, a patient's home, and other non-medical environments such as
school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work
location of a patient.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications services, as defined in section 269‑1, to encompass
four modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to
real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non‑interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a
patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant
site. Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in
combination or by itself, does not constitute a telehealth service for the
purposes of this section. [L 2016, c 226, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next